Utah statutes.
78B-13-105.   International application of chapter.
(1)  A court of this state shall treat a foreign country as a state of the
United States for purposes of applying Part 1, General Provisions, and Part 2,
Jurisdiction.
(2)  A child custody determination made in a foreign country under factual
circumstances in substantial conformity with the jurisdictional standards of
this chapter shall be recognized and enforced under Part 3, Enforcement.
(3)  The court need not apply the provisions of this chapter when the child
custody law of the other country violates fundamental principles of human
rights.
